District of Columbia statutes.
47-2509

Declaration and payment of estimated tax.

Every bank, trust company, and building association, and all bonding, title, guaranty and fidelity companies, subject to the provisions of § 501(a) of the Revenue Act of 1975, shall make and file a declaration of estimated tax at such time or times and under such conditions, and shall make payments of such tax in such amounts and at such times and under such conditions as the Mayor shall, by rule, prescribe. Such payments shall not be in excess of the amount by which said tax was increased by provisions of this act.

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title V, § 501(b), 22 DCR 2091
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-30, § 2, 22 DCR 2545
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 103, 30 DCR 2632
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2509.
1973 Ed., § 47-1711.

“The Revenue Act of 1975” and “this act,” referred to in this section, are references to D.C. Law 1-23, 22 DCR 2091, approved October 21, 1975.

Section 501(a)(1) and 501(a)(2) of the Revenue Act of 1975, are codified as §§ 47-2501 and 47-2502, respectively.

Delegation of authority under Law 5-14, see Mayor’s Order 83-190, July 25, 1983.
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 1102 of D.C. Law 5-14 provided that the Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.